Utah statutes.
58-56-21.   Review of building inspection.
(1)  As used in this section, "International Residential Code" means the
International Residential Code adopted as a state construction code under
Section 58-56-4.
(2)  Subject to Subsection (3), a city or county shall, by ordinance, provide
for review of an inspection conducted by the city's or county's building
inspector for a single-family residential building permit.
(3)  Upon request by a person seeking a single-family residential building
permit, a chief executive officer of the municipal or county issuing the
single-family residential building permit, or the chief executive officer's
designee, shall, with reasonable diligence, review an inspection described in
Subsection (2) to determine whether the inspection constitutes a fair
administration of the building code.
(4)  A review described in this section:
(a)  is separate and unrelated to an appeal under the International
Residential Code;
(b)  may not be used to review a matter that may be brought by appeal under
the International Residential Code;
(c)  may not result in the waiver or modification of an International
Residential Code requirement or standard;
(d)  may not conflict with an appeal, or the result of an appeal, under the
International Residential Code; and
(e)  does not prohibit a person from bringing an appeal under the
International Residential Code.
(5)  A person who seeks a review described in this section may not be
prohibited by preclusion, estoppel, or otherwise from raising an issue or
bringing a claim in an appeal under the International Residential Code on the
grounds that the person raised the issue or brought the claim in the review
described in this section.
